Georgia statutes. 
County lines. - Cities located in more than one county may be consolidated with a county government, however, in the absence of a change in county lines or some additional general legislation to provide for consolidating governments of a city and more than one county, the city would have to give up some of the city's territory. 1998 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U98-10.

36-68-3. Mandatory features of enabling local law.

Statute text

(a) Local laws enacted pursuant to the authority of this chapter shall be subject to the following requirements:

(1) A local law enacted pursuant to the authority of Code Section 36-68-2 shall provide for the creation of a special tax district consisting of the territory lying within the corporate boundaries of the municipality for the purpose of the successor county government levying a tax therein sufficient to retire the bonded indebtedness of the municipality which was outstanding on the effective date of the repeal of the charter of the municipality;

(2) The effectiveness of local laws described in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection shall be contingent upon their approval by the governing authorities of the affected municipality and county prior to the referendums provided for in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection;

(3) The effectiveness of a local law repealing the charter of a municipality shall be contingent upon its approval by a majority of the voters voting within the municipality and upon the parallel local law described by paragraph (4) of this subsection becoming effective; and

(4) The effectiveness of a local law enacted pursuant to the authority of Code Section 36-68-2 shall be contingent upon its approval by a majority of the voters voting throughout the territorial boundaries of the applicable county and upon the parallel local law described by paragraph (3) of this subsection becoming effective.

(b) The requirement for a referendum to repeal a municipal charter under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall apply to the repeal of a municipal charter only when such repeal is a part of a governmental reorganization described by Code Section 36-68-1.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-68-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1080, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 36.)

36-68-4. Conditions under which county containing no municipality deemed to constitute a consolidated government; election; consolidated government to constitute a municipal corporation as well as a county for certain purposes.

Statute text

(a) If as of July 1, 2007, or at any time thereafter there exists in this state a county in which no part of any municipal corporation is located, then the governing authority of that county may elect that the county shall thenceforth be deemed to be and constituted as a consolidated government for purposes of the laws of this state. In order to be effective under this Code section, the election by the county governing authority must comply with all of the following conditions:

(1) The election shall be carried out by the adoption of an appropriate resolution by the county governing authority which must be adopted by unanimous vote of the members of the governing authority voting thereon and ratified by a majority of the electors of the county voting in a referendum;

(2) The election must be made by the county governing authority within one calendar year after July 1, 2007, or such later date as this Code section becomes applicable to the county;

(3) The county must at the time of election be providing at least three of the services specified in subsection (b) of Code Section 36-30-7.1; and

(4) Within 30 days after the adoption of the resolution and ratification by the electors of the county a certification of election must be filed by the county with the Department of Community Affairs in such form and manner as may be specified by the department.

(b) A county which is constituted as a consolidated government under this Code section shall constitute a municipal corporation as well as a county for the purpose of the application of the general laws and Constitution of this state. Such a county may exercise the powers vested in municipalities generally as well as the powers vested in the county by general or local law. When similar but not identical laws apply to counties and municipalities and a determination must be made as to which law applies, the county which is constituted as a consolidated government may elect which law to proceed under.

(c) When a county has become subject to this Code section, no municipal corporation may thereafter be created in or extend into the county.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-68-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 588, § 1/HB 109.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

——————————

CHAPTER 69

MUTUAL AID

Sec.

36-69-1. Short title.

36-69-2. "Local emergency" defined.

36-69-3. Extraterritorial cooperation and assistance to local law enforcement agencies or fire departments; commander of operations.

36-69-3.1. Out-of-state contracts and mutual aid agreements.

36-69-4. Powers and duties of employees of political subdivision or institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia who are rendering aid.

36-69-5. Responsibility for expenses and compensation of employees.

36-69-6. Applicability of privileges, immunities, exemptions, and benefits.

36-69-7. Liability for acts or omissions of responding agency employees.

36-69-8. Construction of chapter.

36-69-9. Cumulative authority of chapter.

36-69-10. Emergencies to which chapter not applicable.

36-69-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Mutual Aid Act."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 887, § 1.)

36-69-2. "Local emergency" defined.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term "local emergency" means the existence of conditions of extreme peril to the safety of persons and property within the territorial limits of a political subdivision of the state or on a campus of an institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia caused by natural disasters, riots, civil disturbances, or other situations presenting major law enforcement and other public safety problems, which conditions are or are likely to be beyond the control of the services, personnel, equipment, and facilities of that political subdivision of the state and which require the combined forces of other political subdivisions of the state to combat.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69-2, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 887, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1959, § 1; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, inserted "or the Technical College System of Georgia" after "University System of Georgia" in this Code section.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407, which amended this Code section, purported to amend Code Section 36-36-2 but actually amended Code Section 36-69-2.

36-69-3. Extraterritorial cooperation and assistance to local law enforcement agencies or fire departments; commander of operations.

Statute text

(a) (1) Upon the request of a local law enforcement agency for assistance in a local emergency, in the prevention or detection of violations of any law, in the apprehension or arrest of any person who violates a criminal law of this state, or in any criminal case, the chief of police or public safety director of any municipality or chief of police or public safety director of any county police force may, with the approval of the governing authority of any such officer's political subdivision, and the sheriff of any county may cooperate with and render assistance extraterritorially to such local law enforcement agency requesting the same.

(2) (A) Upon the request of a local law enforcement agency for assistance in a local emergency, in the prevention or detection of violations of any law, in the apprehension or arrest of any person who violates a criminal law of this state, or in any criminal case, the public safety director or chief of police of any institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia may, with the approval of the president of such institution, cooperate with and render assistance extraterritorially to such law enforcement agency requesting the same.

(B) Upon the request for assistance in a local emergency, in the prevention or detection of violations of any law, in the apprehension or arrest of any person who violates a criminal law of this state, or in any criminal case, which request is made by a public safety director or chief of police of any institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia after approval by the president of such institution, the chief of police or public safety director of any municipality or any county police force may, with the approval of the governing authority of any such officer's political subdivision and the sheriff of the county, cooperate with and render assistance extraterritorially to such law enforcement agency of the institution requesting the same.

(b) Upon the request of any local fire department for assistance in a local emergency, in preventing or suppressing a fire, or in protecting life and property, the fire chief or public safety director of any local political subdivision may, with the approval of the governing authority of such political subdivision, cooperate with and render assistance extraterritorially to such local fire department requesting the same.

(c) Upon the request of any local law enforcement agency or local director of emergency medical services for assistance in a local emergency or in transporting wounded, injured, or sick persons to a place where medical or hospital care is furnished, emergency medical technicians employed by a political subdivision may, with the approval of the governing authority of such political subdivision, cooperate with and render assistance extraterritorially to such local law enforcement agency or local director of emergency services.

(d) Authorization for furnishing assistance extraterritorially may be granted by the sheriff of any county or the governing authority of a local political subdivision or the president of an institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia to any of its agencies or employees covered by this Code section prior to any occurrence resulting in the need for such assistance; provided, however, that any prior authorization granted by the president of an institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia for the furnishing of assistance extraterritorially must be submitted to and approved by the board of regents or the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia, respectively, before it becomes effective. Such authorization may provide limitations and restrictions on such assistance furnished extraterritorially, provided that such limitations and restrictions do not conflict with the provisions of Code Sections 36-69-4 through 36-69-6.

(e) The senior officer of the public safety agency of a political subdivision or institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia which requests assistance in a local emergency as provided in this Code section shall be in command of the local emergency as to strategy, tactics, and overall direction of the operations with respect to the public safety officers and employees rendering assistance extraterritorially at the request of such public safety agency. All orders or directions regarding the operations of the public safety officers and employees rendering assistance extraterritorially shall be relayed to the senior officer in command of the public safety agency rendering assistance extraterritorially.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69-3, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 887, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1959, § 2; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-3/SB 407.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, inserted "or the Technical College System of Georgia" throughout this Code section; in subparagraph (a)(2)(B), deleted "chief of police or public safety director of" following "municipality or" in the middle, substituted "subdivision and the sheriff of the county, cooperate" for "subdivision, and the sheriff of the county may cooperate" near the end; and inserted "or the State Board of the Technical College System of Georgia, respectively," near the end of the first sentence of subsection (d).

Law reviews. - For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 45 (2018).

36-69-3.1. Out-of-state contracts and mutual aid agreements.

Statute text

Any county or municipality in this state shall be authorized to enter into contracts and mutual aid agreements with counties or municipalities of any other state or with any agency of the United States for the provision of law enforcement services in a local emergency to the extent that the laws of such other state or the United States permit such joint contracts or agreements to furnish one another assistance in law enforcement. Any such contract or mutual aid agreement shall have incorporated therein the provisions of Code Sections 36-69-4 through 36-69-8. Any such contract or mutual aid agreement entered into by a county shall not become effective until approved by the sheriff of such county.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69-3.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1311, § 1.)

36-69-4. Powers and duties of employees of political subdivision or institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia who are rendering aid.

Statute text

Whenever the employees of any political subdivision or institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia are rendering aid outside their political subdivision or campus, respectively, and pursuant to the authority contained in this chapter, such employees shall have the same powers, duties, rights, privileges, and immunities as if they were performing their duties in the political subdivision or on the campus of the institution in which they are normally employed.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69-4, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 887, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1959, § 3; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, inserted "or the Technical College System of Georgia" after "University System of Georgia" in this Code section.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407, which amended this Code section, purported to amend Code Section 36-36-4 but actually amended Code Section 36-69-4.

36-69-5. Responsibility for expenses and compensation of employees.

Statute text

Unless otherwise provided by contract, the political subdivision or institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia which furnishes any equipment pursuant to this chapter shall bear the loss or damage to such equipment and shall pay any expense incurred in the operation and maintenance thereof. Unless otherwise provided by contract, the political subdivision or institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia furnishing aid pursuant to this chapter shall compensate its employees during the time of rendering of such aid and shall defray the actual travel and maintenance expenses of such employees while they are rendering such aid. Such compensation shall include any amounts paid or due for compensation due to personal injury or death while such employees are engaged in rendering such aid.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69-5, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 887, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1959, § 4; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, inserted "or the Technical College System of Georgia" after "University System of Georgia" throughout this Code section.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407, which amended this Code section, purported to amend Code Section 36-36-5 but actually amended Code Section 36-69-5.

36-69-6. Applicability of privileges, immunities, exemptions, and benefits.

Statute text

All of the privileges and immunities from liability; exemption from laws, ordinances, and rules; and all pension, insurance, relief, disability, workers' compensation, salary, death, and other benefits which apply to the activity of such officers, agents, or employees of any such political subdivision or institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia when performing their respective functions within the territorial limits of their respective political subdivisions or campuses shall apply to such officers, agents, or employees to the same degree, manner, and extent while engaged in the performance of any of their functions and duties extraterritorially under the provisions of this chapter relating to mutual aid. The provisions of this Code section shall apply with equal effect to paid, volunteer, and auxiliary employees.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69-6, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 887, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1959, § 5; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, inserted "or the Technical College System of Georgia" after "University System of Georgia" in the first sentence of this Code section.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407, which amended this Code section, purported to amend Code Section 36-36-6 but actually amended Code Section 36-69-6.

36-69-7. Liability for acts or omissions of responding agency employees.

Statute text

Neither a public safety agency which requests assistance pursuant to Code Section 36-69-3 nor the political subdivision or institution of the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia in which the public safety agency is located shall be liable for any acts or omissions of employees of a responding public safety agency rendering assistance extraterritorially under the provisions of this chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69-7, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 887, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1959, § 6; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, inserted "or the Technical College System of Georgia" after "University System of Georgia" in this Code section.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407, which amended this Code section, purported to amend Code Section 36-36-7 but actually amended Code Section 36-69-7.

36-69-8. Construction of chapter.

Statute text

(a) The provisions of this chapter shall not be construed as creating a duty on the part of any public safety agency of a local political subdivision or institution within the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia to respond to a request from any public safety agency of another local political subdivision or institution of the University System of Georgia or the Technical College System of Georgia as authorized in Code Section 36-69-3.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (e) of Code Section 36-69-3, the provisions of this chapter shall not be construed as creating a duty on the part of a public safety agency rendering assistance extraterritorially to stay at the scene of a local emergency for any length of time. Such responding public safety agency may depart the scene of a local emergency at any time at the discretion of the officer in command of the public safety agency rendering assistance extraterritorially at the scene of the local emergency.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69-8, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 887, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1959, § 7; Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407.)

Annotations

The 2018 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, inserted "or the Technical College System of Georgia" after "University System of Georgia" in subsection (a).

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2018, p. 550, § 5-4/SB 407, which amended this Code section, purported to amend Code Section 36-36-8 but actually amended Code Section 36-69-8.

36-69-9. Cumulative authority of chapter.

Statute text

(a) The authority of this chapter shall be cumulative to and in addition to mutual aid resource pacts authorized under Chapter 6 of Title 25 or contracts between political subdivisions for the provision of services authorized under Section II of Article IX of the Constitution.

(b) The authority of this chapter shall be cumulative to and in addition to any rights, powers, or authority exercised by the sheriffs of this state as of July 1, 1988.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69-9, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 887, § 1.)

36-69-10. Emergencies to which chapter not applicable.

Statute text

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any emergency in which the chief executive of a political subdivision assigns or makes available for duty the employees, property, or equipment of the subdivision relating to fire fighting, engineering, rescue, health, medical and related services, and to police, transportation, construction, and similar items or services for emergency management purposes outside of the physical limits of the subdivision as provided in Code Section 38-3-27.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69-10, enacted by Ga. L. 1988, p. 887, § 1.)

——————————

CHAPTER 69A

INTERLOCAL COOPERATION

Sec.

36-69A-1. Short title.

36-69A-2. Purpose.

36-69A-3. Definitions.

36-69A-4. Joint exercise of powers, privileges, or authority; agreements with public agencies of other states; required information and provisions; limitations on contracts.

36-69A-5. Preservation of sovereign immunity.

36-69A-6. Submission of agreements to and approval by officers or agencies with applicable powers of control.

36-69A-7. Powers of counties or municipalities in carrying out agreements.

36-69A-8. Contracts with agencies of other states for the performance of governmental services, activities, or undertakings.

36-69A-9. Cumulative authority.

36-69A-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Interlocal Cooperation Act."

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69A-1, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 686, § 1/HB 570.)

36-69A-2. Purpose.

Statute text

It is the purpose of this chapter to permit counties and municipalities in this state the most efficient use of their powers by enabling them to cooperate with localities in other states on a basis of mutual advantage and provide services and facilities in a manner and pursuant to forms of governmental organization that will accord best with geographic, economic, population, and other factors influencing the needs and development of local communities.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69A-2, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 686, § 1/HB 570.)

36-69A-3. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Public agency" means:

(A) Any political subdivision of this state other than a county school district or independent school district;

(B) Any volunteer fire department;

(C) Any volunteer rescue squad;

(D) Any agency of the state government or of the United States; and

(E) Any political subdivision of another state.

(2) "State" means a state of the United States.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69A-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 686, § 1/HB 570.)

36-69A-4. Joint exercise of powers, privileges, or authority; agreements with public agencies of other states; required information and provisions; limitations on contracts.

Statute text

(a) Any power or powers, privileges, or authority exercised or capable of exercise by a public agency of this state may be exercised and enjoyed jointly with any other public agency of any other state or of the United States to the extent that laws of such other state or of the United States permit such joint exercise or enjoyment. The authority for joint or cooperative action of political subdivisions shall apply to powers, privileges, or authority vested in, funded by, or under the control of their governing bodies.

(b) Any public agency in this state may enter into agreements with a public agency in another state for joint or cooperative action pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. Appropriate action of the governing bodies of the participating public agencies by resolution or otherwise pursuant to law shall be necessary before any such agreement may enter into force. Any such agreement shall be subject to the requirements provided by the Constitution and general laws of this state with respect to intergovernmental contracts.

(c) Any such agreement shall specify the following:

(1) The precise organization, composition, and nature of any separate legal or administrative entity or entities created thereby, which may include, but is not limited to, a corporation not for profit, together with the powers delegated to such a corporation;

(2) Its purpose or purposes;

(3) The manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget for such undertaking;

(4) The permissible method or methods to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination; and

(5) Any other necessary and proper matters.

(d) In the event that the agreement does not establish a separate legal entity or entities to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking, the agreement shall, in addition to the requirements of subsection (c) of this Code section contain the following:

(1) Provision for an administrator or a joint board responsible for administering the joint or cooperative undertaking. In the case of a joint board, public agencies party to the agreement shall be represented; and

(2) The manner of acquiring, holding, and disposing of real and personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking.

(e) (1) No agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall relieve any public agency of any obligation or responsibility imposed upon it by law, except that, to the extent of actual and timely performance thereof by a joint board or other legal or administrative entity or entities created by an agreement made hereunder, those performances may be offered in satisfaction of the obligation or responsibility.

(2) (A) A separate legal or administrative entity, created by interlocal agreement under this chapter, is not empowered to:

(i) Assess, levy, or collect ad valorem taxes;

(ii) Issue general obligation bonds; or

(iii) Exercise the power of eminent domain.

(B) However, to the extent that the participating political subdivisions possess such powers, the political subdivisions may exercise such powers on behalf and for the benefit of the separate legal or administrative entity.

(f) (1) Any agreement under this chapter shall contain provisions for the following:

(A) The contract shall terminate absolutely and without further obligation on the part of the county or municipality at the close of the calendar year in which it was executed and at the close of each succeeding calendar year for which it may be renewed as provided in this Code section;

(B) The contract may provide for automatic renewal unless positive action is taken by the county or municipality to terminate such contract, and the nature of such action shall be determined by the county or municipality and specified in the contract;

(C) The contract shall state the total obligation of the county or municipality for the calendar year of execution and shall further state the total obligation which will be incurred in each calendar year renewal term, if renewed; and

(D) The contract shall provide that title to any supplies, materials, equipment, or other personal property shall remain in the vendor until fully paid for by the county or municipality.

(2) In addition to the provisions enumerated in paragraph (1) of this subsection, any contract authorized by this chapter may include:

(A) A provision which requires that the contract will terminate immediately and absolutely at such time as appropriated and otherwise unobligated funds are no longer available to satisfy the obligations of the county or municipality under the contract; or

(B) Any other provision reasonably necessary to protect the interests of the county or municipality.

(3) Any contract developed under this chapter containing the provisions enumerated in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be deemed to obligate the county or municipality only for those sums payable during the calendar year of execution or, in the event of a renewal by the county or municipality, for those sums payable in the individual calendar year renewal term.

(4) No contract developed and executed pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed to create a debt of the county or municipality for the payment of any sum beyond the calendar year of execution or, in the event of a renewal, beyond the calendar year of such renewal.

(5) No contract developed and executed pursuant to this chapter may be delivered if the principal portion of such contract, when added to the amount of debt incurred by any county or municipality pursuant to Article IX, Section V, Paragraph I of the Constitution of Georgia, exceeds 10 percent of the assessed value of all taxable property within such county or municipality.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69A-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 686, § 1/HB 570.)

36-69A-5. Preservation of sovereign immunity.

Statute text

An agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter between or among one or more counties or municipalities of this state and one or more public agencies of another state or of the United States shall not constitute a waiver of sovereign immunity. All of the privileges and immunities from liability; exemption from laws, ordinances, and rules; and all pension, insurance, relief, disability, workers' compensation, salary, death, and other benefits which apply to the activity of such officers, agents, or employees of any such political subdivision or institution within the University System of Georgia when performing their respective functions within the territorial limits of their respective political subdivisions or campuses shall apply to such officers, agents, or employees to the same degree, manner, and extent while engaged in the performance of any of their functions and duties extraterritorially under the provisions of this chapter relating to mutual aid. The provisions of this Code section shall apply with equal effect to paid, volunteer, and auxiliary employees. In any case or controversy involving performance or interpretation thereof or liability thereunder, no action may be brought except in the state or superior court of the county in this state which executed the agreement or the county in this state in which a city in this state is located which executed the agreement.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69A-5, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 686, § 1/HB 570.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For comment, "Keeping the Arms in Touch: Taking Political Accountability Seriously in the Eleventh Amendment Arm of the State Doctrine," see 64 Emory L.J. 819 (2015).

36-69A-6. Submission of agreements to and approval by officers or agencies with applicable powers of control.

Statute text

In the event that an agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall deal in whole or in part with the provision of services or facilities with regard to which an officer or agency of the state government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement shall, as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the state officer or agency having such power of control and shall be approved or disapproved by such state officer or agency as to all matters within such officer's or agency's jurisdiction.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69A-6, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 686, § 1/HB 570.)

36-69A-7. Powers of counties or municipalities in carrying out agreements.

Statute text

Any county or municipality entering into an agreement pursuant to this chapter may appropriate funds and may sell, lease, give, or otherwise supply the administrative joint board or other legal or administrative entity created to operate the joint or cooperative undertaking by providing such personnel or services therefor as may be within its legal power to furnish.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69A-7, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 686, § 1/HB 570.)

36-69A-8. Contracts with agencies of other states for the performance of governmental services, activities, or undertakings.

Statute text

Any one or more counties or municipalities in this state may contract with any one or more public agencies of another state to perform any governmental service, activity, or undertaking which each public agency entering into the contract is authorized by law to perform; provided, however, that such contract shall be authorized by the governing body of each party to the contract. Such contract shall set forth fully the purposes, powers, rights, objectives, and responsibilities of the contracting parties.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69A-8, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 686, § 1/HB 570.)

36-69A-9. Cumulative authority.

Statute text

The authority of this chapter shall be cumulative to and in addition to any rights, powers, or authority otherwise authorized under the Constitution or general laws of this state.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-69A-9, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 686, § 1/HB 570.)

——————————

CHAPTER 70

COORDINATED AND COMPREHENSIVE PLANNING AND SERVICE DELIVERY BY COUNTIES AND MUNICIPALITIES

Article 1

Planning.

36-70-1. Legislative intent and purpose.

36-70-2. Definitions.

36-70-3. Powers of municipalities and counties.

36-70-4. Municipality and county as members of regional commissions; membership dues; participation in compiling Department of Community Affairs data base.

36-70-5. Effect of chapter on county and municipal zoning powers.

36-70-6. Promotion of deployment of broadband services by broadband services providers.

Article 2

Service Delivery.

36-70-20. Legislative intent.

36-70-21. Deadline date for implementation agreement.

36-70-22. Date for process initiation.

36-70-23. Required components.

36-70-24. Criteria for service delivery strategy.

36-70-25. Approval; extension of deadline date.

36-70-25.1. Dispute resolution procedures.

36-70-26. Required filing; verification of components.

36-70-27. (See Editor&#8217;s notes.) Limitation of funding for projects inconsistent with strategy.

36-70-28. "Affected municipality" defined; review and revision of strategy.

Annotations

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Grants of the OneGeorgia Authority, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Title 413.

The Life Sciences Facilities Fund Loan Program Description, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Chapter 110-25.

——————————

ARTICLE 1

PLANNING

36-70-1. Legislative intent and purpose.

Statute text

The local governments of the State of Georgia are of vital importance to the state and its citizens. The state has an essential public interest in promoting, developing, sustaining, and assisting local governments. In addition, the natural resources, environment, and vital areas of the state are of vital importance to the state and its citizens. The state has an essential public interest in protecting and preserving the natural resources, the environment, and the vital areas of the state. The purpose of this article is to provide for local governments to serve these essential public interests of the state by authorizing and promoting the establishment, implementation, and performance of coordinated and comprehensive planning by municipal governments and county governments, and this article shall be construed liberally to achieve that end. This article is enacted pursuant to the authority granted the General Assembly in the Constitution of the State of Georgia, including, but not limited to, the authority provided in Article III, Section VI, Paragraphs I and II(a)(1) and Article IX, Section II, Paragraphs III and IV.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-70-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 1317, § 4.1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1567, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Georgia Wetlands: Values, Trends, and Legal Status," see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 791 (1990). For annual survey on local government law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 205 (2017).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

County board's suit barred by sovereign immunity. - County board's claims against a state agency commissioner and individual board members was properly dismissed as barred by sovereign immunity as the county board's pleadings and briefs demonstrated that the state agency was the real party in interest as the complaint alleged that the state agency was the entity who posted the information on its website preventing the county board from receiving state administered financial assistance. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Mayor & Council of Valdosta, 352 Ga. App. 391, 834 S.E.2d 890 (2019).

36-70-2. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Comprehensive plan" means any plan by a county or municipality covering such county or municipality proposed or prepared pursuant to the minimum standards and procedures for preparation of comprehensive plans and for implementation of comprehensive plans established by the department.

(2) "Coordinated and comprehensive planning" means planning by counties and municipalities undertaken in accordance with the minimum standards and procedures for preparation of plans, for implementation of plans, and for participation in the coordinated and comprehensive planning process, as established by the department.

(3) "County" means any county of this state.

(4) "Department" means the Department of Community Affairs of the State of Georgia created pursuant to Article 1 of Chapter 8 of Title 50.

(5) "Governing authority" or "governing body" means the board of commissioners of a county, sole commissioner of a county, council, commissioners, or other governing authority for a county or municipality.

(5.1) "Inactive municipality" means any municipality which has not for a period of three consecutive calendar years carried out any of the following activities:

(A) The levying or collecting of any taxes or fees;

(B) The provision of any of the following governmental services: water; sewage; garbage collection; police protection; fire protection; or library; or

(C) The holding of a municipal election.

(5.2) "Local government" means any county as defined in paragraph (3) of this Code section or any municipality as defined in paragraph (7) of this Code section. The term does not include any school district of this state nor any sheriff, clerk of the superior court, judge of the probate court, or tax commissioner or the office, personnel, or services provided by such elected officials.

(5.3) "Mechanisms" includes, but is not limited to, intergovernmental agreements, ordinances, resolutions, and local Acts of the General Assembly in effect on July 1, 1997, or executed thereafter.
